Wyoming, session 2025, SF0141.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 24-1-139 is created to read:

24-1-139. USMC CPL Seth Rasmuson memorial highway.

US highway 16 between mile marker 52.47 and mile marker 89
in Johnson county shall be known as the "USMC CPL Seth
Rasmuson Memorial Highway." The department of
SF0141

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0683
transportation shall install appropriate signage, in
compliance with applicable federal and state law, to
identify the USMC CPL Seth Rasmuson Memorial Highway.

Section 2. There is appropriated three thousand
dollars ($3,000.00) from the general fund to the department
of transportation for purposes of installing the signage
required by this act. This appropriation shall be for the
period beginning with the effective date of this act and
ending June 30, 2026. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2026. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation not be included in the department of
transportation's standard budget for the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0141